Florida, session 2026, SB1300.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 40 41 Section 1.âSubsection (35) of section 334.044, Florida 42 Statutes, is amended to read: 43 334.044âPowers and duties of the department.âThe department 44 shall have the following general powers and duties: 45 (35)âTo expend funds for a construction workforce 46 development program, in consultation with affected stakeholders, 47 for delivery of projects designated in the departmentâs work 48 program. The department may annually expend up to $5 million 49 from the State Transportation Trust Fund for fiscal years 2025 50 2026 through 2029-2030 in grants to state colleges, and school 51 districts, and private educational providers, with priority 52 given to state colleges and school districts in counties that 53 are rural communities as defined in s. 288.0656(2), for 54 certification and training opportunities within the Florida 55 Transportation Academy, for the purchase of equipment simulators 56 with authentic original equipment manufacturer controls and a 57 companion curriculum, for the purchase of instructional aids for 58 use in conjunction with the equipment simulators, and to support 59 offering an elective course in heavy civil construction which 60 must, at a minimum, provide the student with an Occupational 61 Safety and Health Administration 10-hour certification and a 62 fill equipment simulator certification. 63 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 334.62, Florida 64 Statutes, is amended to read: 65 334.62âFlorida Transportation Academy.âThe Legislature 66 finds that the growth and sustainability of the transportation 67 industry workforce is vital to the continued success and 68 efficiency of the stateâs supply chain and economic 69 competitiveness. In order to prioritize the continued need for 70 transportation industry workforce development programs, the 71 Florida Transportation Academy is established within the 72 department. In order to support, promote, and sustain workforce 73 development efforts in the transportation sector, the department 74 may do all of the following: 75 (1)âCoordinate with the Department of Corrections to 76 identify and create certification and training opportunities for 77 nonviolent, scheduled-release inmates and inmates who have 2 78 years or less remaining on their sentence and create a 79 notification process between the Department of Corrections and 80 the department for nonviolent inmates with imminent scheduled 81 release dates who are expected to seek employment upon release. 82 Such certification and training opportunities must include 83 programs within the state correctional institutions or 84 correctional facilities to train and license nonviolent, 85 scheduled-release inmates and inmates who have 2 years or less 86 remaining on their sentence to operate a commercial motor 87 vehicle. The curriculum for such programs must include training 88 for Class A and Class B commercial driver licenses. The 89 departmentâs workforce development funds as described in s. 90 334.044(35) may be used to fund such certification and training 91 opportunities. 92 Section 3.âSection 446.55, Florida Statutes, is created to 93 read: 94 446.55âReimbursement for insurance premiums.â 95 (1)âFor purposes of this section, the term âemployerâ means 96 an employer principally headquartered in this state which 97 employed 100 or fewer employees as of the end of the calendar 98 year immediately preceding the year in which reimbursement is 99 sought. 100 (2)âSubject to appropriation, employers may apply to the 101 Department of Financial Services, in a format prescribed by the 102 department, for reimbursement of the proportionate cost of 103 workersâ compensation and automobile liability premiums paid 104 during the fiscal year for former inmates who have less than 2 105 years of commercial driving experience and who were hired during 106 the previous fiscal year. 107 (a)âAn application for reimbursement must include all of 108 the following information: 109 1.âThe number of employees for whom reimbursement is 110 sought. 111 2.âEach employeeâs name, the date he or she was hired, the 112 date on which he or she was issued a commercial driver license, 113 the criminal offense for which the employee was convicted, and 114 the final disposition of the employeeâs case. 115 3.âThe total amount of reimbursement requested and the 116 method used by the employer to determine the proportionate share 117 of the cost of premiums attributable to each employee. 118 4.âThe employerâs name, point of contact, and contact 119 information. 120 5.âAn attestation by the employer agreeing to maintain all 121 documentation supporting the information provided in the 122 application for at least 5 years. 123 6.âAny other information requested by the department. 124 (b)âThe employee for whom reimbursement is sought must be a 125 United States citizen or qualified noncitizen authorized to work 126 in the United States who is proficient in English. 127 (c)âAn employer may not request reimbursement for an 128 employee who was convicted of any of the offenses in s. 129 945.091(5). 130 (3)âWithin 45 days after receipt of a completed 131 application, the department must process the application and 132 notify the applicant of approval or denial of the application. 133 Before making its determination, the department must coordinate 134 with the employer to verify the information on the application 135 relating to the employer and the employees for whom 136 reimbursement is sought. 137 (4)âReimbursements provided under this section are limited 138 to $5,000 per employee and $20,000 per employer. 139 Section 4.âParagraph (h) of subsection (3) and subsections 140 (5) and (6) of section 944.801, Florida Statutes, are amended to 141 read: 142 944.801âEducation for state prisoners.â 143 (3)âThe responsibilities of the Correctional Education 144 Program shall be to: 145 (h)âDevelop a written procedure for selecting programs to 146 add to or delete from the vocational curriculum. The procedure 147 shall include labor market analyses that demonstrate the 148 projected demand for certain occupations and the projected 149 supply of potential employees. In conducting these analyses, the 150 department shall evaluate the feasibility of adding vocational 151 education programs that have been identified by the Department 152 of Commerce, the Department of Education, or a regional 153 coordinating council as being in undersupply in this state. The 154 department shall periodically reevaluate the vocational 155 education programs in major institutions to determine which of 156 the programs support and provide relevant skills to inmates who 157 could be assigned to a correctional work program that is 158 operated as a Prison Industry Enhancement Program. The annual 159 report of correctional education activities required under 160 paragraph (f) must include all of the following information: 161 1.âThe number of inmates who completed vocational training 162 through the Correctional Education Program. 163 2.âThe number of inmates who completed vocational training 164 through the Correctional Education Program and were employed 165 within 6 months after being released from prison. 166 3.âStatistics on whether the employed former inmates who 167 completed training through the Correctional Education Program 168 are employed in an occupation aligned with their education and 169 training received through the Correctional Education Program. 170 (5)âThe Correctional Education Program may: 171 (a)âEstablish a prison entrepreneurship program and adopt 172 procedures for admitting student inmates. If the department 173 elects to develop the program, it must include at least 180 days 174 of in-prison education. The program curriculum must include a 175 component on developing a business plan, procedures for 176 graduation and certification of successful student inmates, and 177 at least 90 days of transitional and postrelease continuing 178 educational services. Transitional and postrelease continuing 179 educational services may be offered to graduate student inmates 180 on a voluntary basis and are not a requirement for completion of 181 the program. The department shall enter into agreements with 182 public or private colleges or universities, other nonprofit 183 entities, or other authorized providers under s. 1002.45(1)(a)1. 184 to implement the program. The program must be funded with 185 existing resources. 186 (b)(6)âThe Correctional Education Program may Work in 187 cooperation with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 188 Services, Florida Forestry Service Division, and the Florida 189 Department of Financial Services, Division of State Fire Marshal 190 to develop a program for implementation within state 191 correctional institutions or correctional facilities to train 192 and certify inmates as firefighters. The program should include, 193 but not be limited to, certification of inmates as state forest 194 staff trained to help protect homes, forestland, and natural 195 resources from the effects of wildfires throughout the state. 196 (c)âDevelop and implement a vocational curriculum for 197 implementation within the state correctional institutions or 198 correctional facilities to train and license inmates to operate 199 a commercial motor vehicle. The vocational curriculum must 200 include training for Class A and Class B driver licenses, and 201 participation in such curriculum is limited to prerelease 202 inmates and inmates who have 2 years or less remaining to serve 203 on their sentence. 204 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 205 945.091, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 206 945.091âExtension of the limits of confinement; restitution 207 by employed inmates.â 208 (1)âThe department may adopt rules permitting the extension 209 of the limits of the place of confinement of an inmate as to 210 whom there is reasonable cause to believe that the inmate will 211 honor his or her trust by authorizing the inmate, under 212 prescribed conditions and following investigation and approval 213 by the secretary, or the secretaryâs designee, who shall 214 maintain a written record of such action, to leave the confines 215 of that place unaccompanied by a custodial agent for a 216 prescribed period of time to: 217 (b)âWork at paid employment, participate in an education or 218 a training program, or voluntarily serve a public or nonprofit 219 agency or faith-based service group in the community, while 220 continuing as an inmate of the institution or facility in which 221 the inmate is confined, except during the hours of his or her 222 employment, education, training, or service and traveling 223 thereto and therefrom. An inmate may travel to and from his or 224 her place of employment, education, or training only by means of 225 walking, bicycling, or using public transportation or 226 transportation that is provided by a family member or employer. 227 Contingent upon specific appropriations or as authorized in s. 228 945.0913(2), the department may transport an inmate in a state 229 owned vehicle if the inmate is unable to obtain other means of 230 travel to his or her place of employment, education, or 231 training. 232 1.âAn inmate may participate in paid employment only during 233 the last 36 months of his or her confinement, unless sooner 234 requested by the Florida Commission on Offender Review or the 235 Control Release Authority. 236 2.âWhile working at paid employment and residing in the 237 facility, an inmate may apply for placement at a contracted 238 substance abuse transition housing program. The transition 239 assistance specialist shall inform the inmate of program 240 availability and assess the inmateâs need and suitability for 241 transition housing assistance. If an inmate is approved for 242 placement, the specialist shall assist the inmate. If an inmate 243 requests and is approved for placement in a contracted faith 244 based substance abuse transition housing program, the specialist 245 must consult with the chaplain before such placement. The 246 department shall ensure that an inmateâs faith orientation, or 247 lack thereof, will not be considered in determining admission to 248 a faith-based program and that the program does not attempt to 249 convert an inmate toward a particular faith or religious 250 preference. 251 Section 6.âSection 945.0913, Florida Statutes, is amended 252 to read: 253 945.0913âInmates prohibited from driving state-owned 254 vehicles to transport inmates in a work-release program; 255 exception.â 256 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), an inmate may not 257 drive a state-owned vehicle for the purpose of transporting 258 inmates who are participating in a work-release program 259 authorized in s. 945.091(1)(b). 260 (2)âAn inmate may drive a state-owned vehicle if he or she 261 is participating in, or a graduate of, a department career and 262 technical education program or a contracted commercial driver 263 license training program. An inmate may only operate a state 264 owned vehicle on department property or other state-owned 265 property that is specifically designated for career and 266 technical education purposes. 267 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.